Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 327.011 is amended to read:
327.011. For the purpose of State School Fund distributions for school districts:
(1) Local Revenues are the total of the following:
(a) The amount of revenue offset against local property taxes as determined by the  Department
of Revenue under ORS 311.175 (3)(a)(A).
(b) The amount of property taxes actually received by the district, including penalties and  in-
terest on taxes.
(c) The amount of revenue received  by the district from the Common School Fund under ORS
327.403 to 327.410.
(d) The amount of revenue received by the district from the county school fund.
(e) The amount of revenue received by the district from the  25 percent of federal forest reserve
revenues required to be distributed to schools by ORS 294.060 (1).
(f) The amount of revenue received by the district from state managed forestlands  under ORS
530.115 (1)(b) and (c).
(g) Moneys received in lieu of property taxes.
(h) Federal  funds received without specific application by the school district and that are not
deemed under federal law to be nonsupplantable.
(i) Any positive  amount obtained by subtracting the operating property taxes actually imposed
by the district, based on the rate certified pursuant to  ORS 310.060, from the amount that would
have been imposed by the district if the district had certified the  maximum rate of operating prop-
erty taxes allowed by law.
(j) Any amount distributed to the district in the prior fiscal year under ORS 327.019 (8).
(2) Local Revenues do not include:
(a) If a school district imposes local option taxes pursuant to ORS 280.040  to 280.145, an amount
equal to the least of:
(A) The amount of revenue actually received by the district from  local option taxes imposed
pursuant to ORS 280.040 to 280.145;
(B) [ Twenty] Twenty-five percent  of the total received by the school district from the general
purpose grant, the transportation grant, the  facility grant and the high cost disabilities grant of the
district, as those grants are calculated under ORS 327.013; or
Enrolled House Bill 4117 (HB 4117-INTRO) Page 1
(C) [$1,000] $2,000 per district extended ADMw, as calculated under ORS 327.013, increased each
fiscal year by three percent above the amount allowed per district extended  ADMw for the prior
fiscal year.
(b) For a school district with a  statutory rate limit on July 1, 2003, that is greater than $4.50
per $1,000 of assessed value, the amount of property taxes actually  received by the district, includ-
ing penalties and interest on  taxes, that results from an increase in the rate of ad valorem property
tax of the district allowed under [ section 11 (5)(d), ] Article XI , section 11 (5)(d),  of  the Oregon
Constitution.
SECTION 2. (1) The amendments to ORS 327.011 by section  1 of this 2018 Act apply to
State School Fund distributions commencing with the 2018-2019 distributions.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 327.099, 327.101  and 327.120, the Superintendent of Public In-
struction may not  make any adjustments in apportionments of State School Fund moneys
or otherwise require a payment from, or withhold a payment to, a school district if:
(a) The amount of Local  Revenues, as described in ORS 327.011, actually received by the
school district exceeded the amount specified in:
(A) ORS 327.011 (2)(a)(B) by more than 20 percent of the total grants but  not more than
25 percent; or
(B) ORS 327.011 (2)(a)(C) by more than $1,000 per district extended ADMw but  not more
than $2,000 per district extended ADMw; and
(b) The amount described in  paragraph (a) of this subsection was received in fiscal year
2015-2016, 2016-2017, 2017-2018 or 2018-2019.
SECTION 3. This 2018 Act takes effect on July 1, 2018.
Passed by House February 16, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 26, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4117 (HB 4117-INTRO) Page 2